Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-935
Mental health board; review hearing; order discharge or change treatment disposition; when.

(1) Upon the filing of a periodic report under section 71-932, the subject, the subject's counsel, or the subject's legal guardian or conservator, if any, may request and shall be entitled to a review hearing by the mental health board and to seek from the board an order of discharge from commitment or a change in treatment ordered by the board. The mental health board shall schedule the review hearing no later than fourteen calendar days after receipt of such request. The mental health board may schedule a review hearing (a) at any time pursuant to section 71-937 or 71-938, (b) upon the request of the subject, the subject's counsel, the subject's legal guardian or conservator, if any, the county attorney, the official, agency, or other person or entity designated by the mental health board under section 71-931 to prepare and oversee the subject's individualized treatment plan, or the mental health professional directly involved in implementing such plan, or (c) upon the board's own motion.

(2) The board shall immediately discharge the subject or enter a new treatment order with respect to the subject whenever it is shown by any person or it appears upon the record of the periodic reports filed under section 71-932 to the satisfaction of the board that (a) cause no longer exists for the care or treatment of the subject or (b) a less restrictive treatment alternative exists for the subject. When discharge or a change in disposition is in issue, due process protections afforded under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act shall attach to the subject.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 56;

Laws 1994, LB 498, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 108;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1046;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 55.

The Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act clearly and plainly contemplates that due process be afforded at hearings other than the one held upon the filing of the initial petition. In re Interest of Powers, 242 Neb. 19, 493 N.W.2d 166 (1992).

Upon review of a commitment under this section, the State must prove by clear and convincing evidence that the individual remains mentally ill and dangerous. In re Interest of Dickson, 238 Neb. 148, 469 N.W.2d 357 (1991).